Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB413.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of amending the Constitution of Kentucky to
establish that a person is eligible to serve in the office of Governor for a maximum of two
terms and Lieutenant Governor for a maximum of two terms as stated below?
Section 2. It is proposed that Section 71 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
The Governor shall be ineligible to the office of Governor[for the succeeding four
years] after the expiration of any second[ consecutive] term for which he or she shall
have been elected or assumed office by succession pursuant to Section 84 of this
Constitution, for a total not to exceed eight years served as Governor. In determining
the eligibility of an individual to hold the office of Governor as provided in this section,
time served in an office in fulfillment of a partial term as a result of a special election
or assumption of office by succession to fill a vacancy shall not be considered unless
the partial term is two full years or more.
Section 3. It is proposed that Section 82 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
The Lieutenant Governor shall be ineligible to the office of Lieutenant Governor[
for the succeeding four (4) years] after the expiration of any second[ consecutive] term
for which he or she shall have been elected or appointed for a total not to exceed eight
years served as Lieutenant Governor. In determining the eligibility of an individual to
hold the office of Lieutenant Governor as provided in this section, time served in an
office in fulfillment of a partial term as a result of a special election or appointment to
fill a vacancy shall not be considered unless the partial term is two full years or more.
An individual shall be ineligible to the office of Lieutenant Governor if he or she is
ineligible to the office of Governor pursuant to Section 71 or 72 of this Constitution, or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/15/2026 12:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1751
as otherwise provided in this Constitution.
Section 4. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 5 and 6
of this Act.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the question in Section 1 of this Act and the entirety of the
proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Sections 2 and 3 of
this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation published
in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the same manner
the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their acceptance or
rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be
voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415 shall be made no
later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which the amendment is to
be voted on.
Section 6. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, not
later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August preceding the next
regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be chosen in a year in
which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the United States, or not
later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September preceding a regular election
in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice President of the United
States, the Secretary of State shall certify the complete text of Section 1 of this Act and
the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in
Sections 2 and 3 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk shall
have the entirety of the text and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on the ballots
provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting machines in
use in each county or precinct.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/15/2026 12:48 PM Jacketed